Virginia statutes. Title 28.2. Fisheries and Habitat of the Tidal Waters
Article 4. Officers, Agents, and Districts

§ 28.2-222.
Districts.

The Commission shall divide and periodically redistrict the territory over which it has jurisdiction into the smallest number of districts commensurate with the efficient enforcement of the Virginia fish and shellfish laws.

History.

Code 1950, § 28-33; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-37; 1992, c. 836.

§ 28.2-223.
Appointment of officers.

The Commissioner shall assign at least one officer to each district.

History.

Code 1950, § 28-34; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-39; 1992, c. 836.

§ 28.2-224.
Collection of license fees.

The Commissioner may designate an officer assigned to a district or authorized agents in the districts to sell licenses, as circumstances require. Such persons shall be bonded in a sum that will protect the Commission from any loss.

History.

Code 1950, § 28-38; 1952, c. 649; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-43; 1992, c. 836.